Massachusetts, session 194th, H4.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16 of chapter 58 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking
out the words “reimbursement percentage”.
SECTION 2. Section 17 of chapter 58 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking
out the section in its entirety and inserting in place thereof the following:-
Section 17. The treasurer in every year, not later than November twentieth, shall
reimburse each town in which the commonwealth owns lands for the purposes named in section
thirteen an amount in lieu of taxes upon the value of such land as reported to him by the
commissioner under the preceding section, determined by multiplying each thousand dollars of
valuation or fractional part thereof by the rate and in an amount provided for as follows:-
The rate equal to the average of the annual rates for three years preceding that in which
such value is laid, said annual rates to be determined by an apportionment of the whole amount
of money to be raised by taxation upon property in the commonwealth during each of the said
of 2

three years, as returned by the assessors and approved by the commissioner, upon the aggregate
valuation of all towns for each of the said three years, as returned under section 10C of chapter
58t.
The amount shall never be less than that paid in the prior year, except for the value of
land removed from the program as described in section 15 of chapter 58.
of 2